Illinois, session 104th, HB1349.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 5changing Section 11-1426.1 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 5/11-1426.1)7    Sec. 11-1426.1. Operation of non-highway vehicles on 8streets, roads, and highways.9    (a) As used in this Section, "non-highway vehicle" means a 10motor vehicle not specifically designed to be used on a public 11highway, including:12        (1) an all-terrain vehicle, as defined by Section 13    1-101.8 of this Code;14        (2) a golf cart, as defined by Section 1-123.9;15        (3) an off-highway motorcycle, as defined by Section 16    1-153.1; and17        (4) a recreational off-highway vehicle, as defined by 18    Section 1-168.8. 19    (b) Except as otherwise provided in this Section, it is 20unlawful for any person to drive or operate a non-highway 21vehicle upon any street, highway, or roadway in this State. If 22the operation of a non-highway vehicle is authorized under 23subsection (d), the non-highway vehicle may be operated only   HB1349- 2 -LRB104 06002 LNS 16035 b1on streets where the posted speed limit is 35 miles per hour or 2less. This subsection (b) does not prohibit a non-highway 3vehicle from crossing a road or street at an intersection 4where the road or street has a posted speed limit of more than 535 miles per hour.6    (b-5) A person may not operate a non-highway vehicle upon 7any street, highway, or roadway in this State unless he or she 8has a valid driver's license issued in his or her name by the 9Secretary of State or by a foreign jurisdiction.10    (c) No person operating a non-highway vehicle shall make a 11direct crossing upon or across any tollroad, interstate 12highway, or controlled access highway in this State. No person 13operating a non-highway vehicle shall make a direct crossing 14upon or across any other highway under the jurisdiction of the 15State except at an intersection of the highway with another 16public street, road, or highway. 17    (c-5) (Blank).18    (d) A municipality, township, county, or other unit of 19local government may authorize, by ordinance or resolution, 20the operation of non-highway vehicles on roadways under its 21jurisdiction if the unit of local government determines that 22the public safety will not be jeopardized. The Department may 23authorize the operation of non-highway vehicles on the 24roadways under its jurisdiction if the Department determines 25that the public safety will not be jeopardized. The unit of 26local government or the Department may restrict the types of   HB1349- 3 -LRB104 06002 LNS 16035 b1non-highway vehicles that are authorized to be used on its 2streets.3    Before permitting the operation of non-highway vehicles on 4its roadways, a municipality, township, county, other unit of 5local government, or the Department must consider the volume, 6speed, and character of traffic on the roadway and determine 7whether non-highway vehicles may safely travel on or cross the 8roadway. Upon determining that non-highway vehicles may safely 9operate on a roadway and the adoption of an ordinance or 10resolution by a municipality, township, county, or other unit 11of local government, or authorization by the Department, 12appropriate signs shall be posted.13    If a roadway is under the jurisdiction of more than one 14unit of government, non-highway vehicles may not be operated 15on the roadway unless each unit of government agrees and takes 16action as provided in this subsection.17    (e) No non-highway vehicle may be operated on a roadway 18unless, at a minimum, it has the following: brakes, a steering 19apparatus, tires, a rearview mirror, red reflectorized warning 20devices in the front and rear, a slow moving emblem (as 21required of other vehicles in Section 12-709 of this Code) on 22the rear of the non-highway vehicle, a headlight that emits a 23white light visible from a distance of 500 feet to the front, a 24tail lamp that emits a red light visible from at least 100 feet 25from the rear, brake lights, and turn signals. When operated 26on a roadway, a non-highway vehicle shall have its headlight   HB1349- 4 -LRB104 06002 LNS 16035 b1and tail lamps lighted as required by Section 12-201 of this 2Code.3    (f) A person who drives or is in actual physical control of 4a non-highway vehicle on a roadway while under the influence 5is subject to Sections 11-500 through 11-502 of this Code.6    (g) Any person who operates a non-highway vehicle on a 7street, highway, or roadway shall be subject to the mandatory 8insurance requirements under Article VI of Chapter 7 of this 9Code. 10    (h) It shall not be unlawful for any person to drive or 11operate a non-highway vehicle, as defined in paragraphs (1) 12and (4) of subsection (a) of this Section, on a county roadway 13or township roadway for the purpose of conducting farming 14operations to and from the home, farm, farm buildings, and any 15adjacent or nearby farm land.16    Non-highway vehicles, as used in this subsection (h), 17shall not be subject to subsections (e) and (g) of this 18Section. However, if the non-highway vehicle, as used in this 19Section, is not covered under a motor vehicle insurance policy 20pursuant to subsection (g) of this Section, the vehicle must 21be covered under a farm, home, or non-highway vehicle 22insurance policy issued with coverage amounts no less than the 23minimum amounts set for bodily injury or death and for 24destruction of property under Section 7-203 of this Code. 25Non-highway vehicles operated on a county or township roadway 26at any time between one-half hour before sunset and one-half   HB1349- 5 -LRB104 06002 LNS 16035 b1hour after sunrise must be equipped with head lamps and tail 2lamps, and the head lamps and tail lamps must be lighted.3    Non-highway vehicles, as used in this subsection (h), 4shall not make a direct crossing upon or across any tollroad, 5interstate highway, or controlled access highway in this 6State. 7    Non-highway vehicles, as used in this subsection (h), 8shall be allowed to cross a State highway, municipal street, 9county highway, or road district highway if the operator of 10the non-highway vehicle makes a direct crossing provided:11        (1) the crossing is made at an angle of approximately 12    90 degrees to the direction of the street, road or highway 13    and at a place where no obstruction prevents a quick and 14    safe crossing;15        (2) the non-highway vehicle is brought to a complete 16    stop before attempting a crossing;17        (3) the operator of the non-highway vehicle yields the 18    right of way to all pedestrian and vehicular traffic which 19    constitutes a hazard; and20        (4) that when crossing a divided highway, the crossing 21    is made only at an intersection of the highway with 22    another public street, road, or highway. 23    (i) No action taken by a unit of local government under 24this Section designates the operation of a non-highway vehicle 25as an intended or permitted use of property with respect to 26Section 3-102 of the Local Governmental and Governmental   HB1349- 6 -LRB104 06002 LNS 16035 b1Employees Tort Immunity Act. 2    (j) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section, 3it shall be permissible to operate a non-highway vehicle on 4all roadways within the boundaries of a municipality that (i) 5has a total population that does not exceed 10,000 persons, 6(ii) has a population density of less than 750 persons per 7square mile, and (iii) has authorized the use of non-highway 8vehicles under subsection (d). A non-highway vehicle being 9operated within a municipality under this Section shall be 10operated only:11        (1) by a disabled veteran who would be otherwise 12    eligible for a disabled veteran registration plate and who 13    has been issued a person with disabilities parking 14    placard;15        (2) on the farthest outside lane or shoulder of a 16    roadway with a speed limit not in excess of 35 miles per 17    hour;18        (3) for a distance of less than 5 miles per one-way 19    trip from the point of origin to the point of destination;20        (4) with the person with disabilities parking placard 21    displayed, and the vehicle meeting the requirements set 22    forth in subsections (e) and (g); and23        (5) without crossing any toll roads or limited-access 24    highways.25(Source: P.A. 97-144, eff. 7-14-11; 98-567, eff. 1-1-14.) 26    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon   HB1349- 7 -LRB104 06002 LNS 16035 b1becoming law.